Utah statutes.
41-6a-1603.   Lights and illuminating devices -- Duty to display -- Time.

(1) (a)  The operator of a vehicle shall turn on the lamps or lights of the vehicle on a highway at any time from a half hour after sunset to a half hour before sunrise and at any other time when, due to insufficient light or unfavorable atmospheric conditions, persons and vehicles on the highway are not clearly discernible at a distance of 1,000 feet ahead.

(b)  The lights, lighted lamps, and other lamps and illuminating devices under Subsection (1)(a) shall be lighted as respectively required for different classes of vehicles, subject to the exceptions for parked vehicles under Section 41-6a-1607.

(2)  Whenever a requirement is made as to distance from which certain lamps and devices shall render objects visible or within which the lamps or devices shall be visible, the provisions apply during the times specified under Subsection (1)(a) for a vehicle without load on a straight, level, unlighted highway under normal atmospheric conditions, unless a different time or condition is expressly stated.

(3)  Whenever a requirement is made as to the mounted height of lamps or devices it shall mean from the center of the lamp or device to the level ground upon which the vehicle stands when the vehicle is without a load.

